Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 96. RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS

Sec. 96.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.1639(37), eff. April 2, 2015.

(2) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.1639(37), eff. April 2, 2015.

(3) "Health facility" includes:

(A) a general or special hospital licensed by the department under Chapter 241;

(B) a physician-owned or physician-operated clinic;

(C) a publicly or privately funded medical school;

(D) a state hospital operated by the department or a state supported living center operated by the Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(E) a public health clinic conducted by a local health unit, health department, or public health district organized and recognized under Chapter 121; and

(F) another facility specified by a rule adopted by the executive commissioner.

(4) "Local health unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 121.004.

(5) "RSV" means respiratory syncytial virus.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0332, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1639(37), eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 96.002. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) Except as specifically authorized by this chapter, reports, records, and information furnished to a department employee or to an authorized agent of the department that relate to cases or suspected cases of a health condition are confidential and may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Reports, records, and information relating to cases or suspected cases of health conditions are not public information under Chapter 552, Government Code, and may not be released or made public on subpoena or otherwise except as provided by this chapter.

(c) The department may release medical, epidemiological, or toxicological information:

(1) for statistical purposes, if released in a manner that prevents the identification of any person;

(2) to medical personnel, appropriate state agencies, health authorities, regional directors, and public officers of counties and municipalities as necessary to comply with this chapter and rules relating to the identification, monitoring, and referral of children with RSV; or

(3) to appropriate federal agencies, such as the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Public Health Service.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 96.003. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY. A health professional, a health facility, or an administrator, officer, or employee of a health facility subject to this chapter is not civilly or criminally liable for divulging information required to be released under this chapter, except in a case of gross negligence or wilful misconduct.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 96.004. COOPERATION OF GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES. Another state board, commission, agency, or governmental entity capable of assisting the department in carrying out the intent of this chapter shall cooperate with the department and furnish expertise, services, and facilities to the sentinel surveillance program.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 96.005. SENTINEL SURVEILLANCE PROGRAM. (a) The executive commissioner shall establish in the department a program to:

(1) identify by sentinel surveillance RSV infection in children; and

(2) maintain a central database of laboratory-confirmed cases of RSV that can be used to investigate the incidence, prevalence, and trends of RSV.

(b) In establishing the sentinel surveillance program for RSV, the executive commissioner shall consider:

(1) the number and geographic distribution of children in the state;

(2) the location of health facilities that collect RSV information locally; and

(3) the use of existing data collected by health facilities.

(c) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules to govern the operation of the program and carry out the intent of this chapter, including rules that specify a system for selecting the demographic areas in which the department collects information.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 96.006. DATA COLLECTION. (a) To ensure an accurate source of data, the executive commissioner may require a health facility or health professional to make available for review by the department or by an authorized agent medical records or other information that is in the facility's or professional's custody or control and that relates to an occurrence of RSV.

(b) The executive commissioner by rule shall prescribe the manner in which data are reported to the department.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 96.007. DATABASE. (a) Information collected and analyzed by the department or an authorized agent under this chapter may be placed in a central database to facilitate information sharing and provider education.

(b) The department may use the database to:

(1) design and evaluate measures to prevent the occurrence of RSV and other health conditions; and

(2) provide information and education to providers on the incidence of RSV infection.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.